Wisconsin, session 2025, AB713.
do enact as follows:AB713,11Section 1. 287.07 (6) of the statutes is created to read:AB713,3,22287.07 (6) Batteries. Beginning on January 1, 2028, no person may dispose 3of or burn a covered battery, as defined in s. 287.175 (1) (d), in a solid waste disposal 1facility. Such a battery may be disposed of only by delivery to a collection site or 2collection event operated under a battery stewardship plan under s. 287.175.AB713,23Section 2. 287.175 of the statutes is created to read:AB713,3,54287.175 Battery collection and recycling. (1) Definitions. In this 5section:AB713,3,86(a) “Battery containing product” means a product that contains or is packaged 7with a covered battery. “Battery containing product” does not include a product 8that is an eligible electronic device, as defined in s. 287.17 (1) (gs).AB713,3,129(b) “Battery stewardship organization” means an entity that has been 10designated by one or more producers to implement a battery stewardship plan 11under this section. “Battery stewardship organization” does not include a state 12agency, as defined in s. 16.004 (12) (a).AB713,3,1713(c) “Collection rate” means the percentage calculated by dividing the total 14weight of covered batteries collected in this state by a battery stewardship 15organization in a calendar year by the average annual weight of covered batteries 16estimated to have been sold in this state by all producers during that same calendar 17year and the previous 2 calendar years.AB713,3,2118(d) “Covered battery” means a portable battery or a medium format battery 19that is intended or designed to be easily removed, or is capable of being easily 20removed, using common household tools. “Covered battery” does not include any of 21the following:AB713,3,24221. A battery, contained in a medical device that is regulated under the federal 23food, drug and cosmetic act, 21 USC 301 to 394, that is not designed or marketed for 24sale or resale at retail locations for personal use.AB713,4,212. A battery that contains an electrolyte as a free liquid or a product that 2contains such a battery.AB713,4,433. A lead acid battery subject to the requirements of s. 287.18 or a product 4that contains such a battery.AB713,4,554. An alkaline battery in which the electrolyte has a pH value above 7.AB713,4,66(e) “Medium format battery” means any of the following:AB713,4,871. For primary batteries, a battery that weighs more than 4.4 pounds but not 8more than 25 pounds.AB713,4,1192. For rechargeable batteries, a battery that weighs more than 11 pounds, or 10that has a rating of more than 300 watt-hours, or both, but that does not weigh more 11than 25 pounds or have a rating of more than 2,000 watt-hours.AB713,4,1212(f) “Portable battery” means any of the following:AB713,4,13131. For primary batteries, a battery that weighs no more than 4.4 pounds.AB713,4,15142. For rechargeable batteries, a battery that weighs no more than 11 pounds 15and that has a rating of no more than 300 watt-hours.AB713,4,1616(g) “Primary battery” means a battery that is not capable of being recharged.AB713,4,1917(h) 1. “Producer” means a person that sells, offers for sale, or distributes for 18sale a covered battery or battery containing product in or into this state and that is 19any of the following:AB713,4,2220a. If the covered battery or battery containing product is sold under a brand of 21the battery’s or product’s manufacturer, the person that manufactures the battery 22or product.AB713,5,223b. If the covered battery or battery containing product is sold under a retail 1brand or under a brand owned by a person other than the battery’s or product’s 2manufacturer, the person that owns the brand.AB713,5,63c. If subd. 1. a. and b. do not apply, the person that is the licensee of a brand or 4trademark under which the covered battery or battery containing product is sold, 5offered for sale, or distributed for sale in or into this state, regardless of whether the 6trademark is registered in this state.AB713,5,107d. If subd. 1. a. to c. do not apply to any person within the United States, the 8person that is the importer of record for the covered battery or battery containing 9product into the United States for the purpose of selling, offering for sale, or 10distributing for sale the battery or product in or into this state.AB713,5,12112. “Producer” does not include a retailer unless the retailer owns the brand 12under which a covered battery or battery containing product is sold.AB713,5,1513(i) “Rechargeable battery” means a battery that contains one or more voltaic 14or galvanic cells electrically connected to produce electric energy and that is 15designed to be recharged.AB713,5,2216(j) “Recycling” means the process by which covered batteries or battery 17containing products are returned to productive use as material or energy, including 18the collection and transport of batteries for recycling. “Recycling” does not include 19destruction by incineration or other processes or land disposal of recyclable 20materials and does not include reuse, repair, or any other process by which batteries 21or battery containing products are returned in their original form or in a form for 22secondary use.AB713,6,223(k) “Recycling efficiency rate” means the percentage calculated by dividing the 1weight of components and materials recycled by a battery stewardship organization 2by the weight of covered batteries collected by the battery stewardship organization.AB713,6,43(L) “Retailer” means a person that only sells or offers for sale a covered battery 4or battery containing product in this state. “Retailer” does not include a producer.AB713,6,135(2) Prohibitions. (a) Beginning on January 1, 2027, or one year after the 6effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], whichever occurs first, no 7producer may sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale in or into this state any 8covered battery or battery containing product unless the producer has designated a 9battery stewardship organization to implement a battery stewardship plan 10approved by the department under this section and listed by the department on its 11website under sub. (8) (f) 3. A producer may contract their obligations under this 12paragraph to another producer if the producer being contracted is a member of a 13battery stewardship organization in this state.AB713,6,2014(b) Beginning on January 1, 2027, or one year after the effective date of this 15paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], whichever occurs first, no producer may sell, offer 16for sale, or distribute for sale in or into this state any covered battery or battery 17containing product unless the covered battery or battery in the battery containing 18product is marked with an identification of the producer of the battery. This 19paragraph does not apply if the battery is less than one-half inch in diameter or 20does not contain a surface with a length that exceeds one-half inch.AB713,7,221(c) Beginning on January 1, 2029, no producer may sell, offer for sale, or 22distribute for sale in or into this state any covered battery or battery containing 23product unless the covered battery or battery in the battery containing product is 24marked to ensure proper collection and recycling, by identifying the chemistry of 1the battery and including an indication that the battery should not be disposed of as 2household waste.AB713,7,53(d) A producer, retailer, or battery stewardship organization may not charge a 4point-of-sale fee to consumers to cover the costs of implementing a battery 5stewardship plan approved under this section. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab713 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab713 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB713 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB713 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB713: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting